Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 27 Retirement of Research Dogs and Cats

4-27-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Research Animal Retirement Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 283, § 1.

4-27-2.
Research dogs and cats — Retirement.

A higher education research facility that receives public money, including tax-exempt status, or a facility that provides research in collaboration with a higher education facility shall, after the completion of any testing or research involving a dog or cat, assess the health of the dog or cat and determine whether it is suitable for adoption. The facility shall thereafter make reasonable efforts to offer for adoption the dog or cat determined to be suitable for adoption, either through private placement or through an animal rescue and shelter organization; a duly incorporated society for the prevention of cruelty to animals; a duly incorporated humane society; or a duly incorporated animal protective association that operates physical animal sheltering facilities and offers household pets to the public for adoption by way of an established adoption program. These efforts shall be made prior to euthanizing the dog or cat. Nothing in this section shall create a duty upon an organization, association, or society to accept a dog or cat offered by a higher education research facility for adoption.

A facility that is required to offer dogs or cats for adoption under this section may enter into an agreement with an animal rescue and shelter organization; a duly incorporated society for the prevention of cruelty to animals; a duly incorporated humane society; or a duly incorporated animal protective association that operates physical animal sheltering facilities and offers household pets to the public for adoption by way of an established adoption program.

The attending or institutional veterinarian at a facility that is required to offer dogs or cats for adoption under this section shall have the authority to assess the health of an animal and determine whether an animal is suitable for adoption.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 283, § 1.